Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6183.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Tiverton emergency moratorium.
(a) If the town of Tiverton, shall at any time have an aggregate of five hundred (500) or
more units proposed in a comprehensive permit project or projects, the town of Tiverton may enact
an emergency moratorium and not accept or process further applications. No application proposed,
offered, submitted or tendered during any moratorium imposed pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall have any grandfathered status.
(b) The town of Tiverton, upon adoption of any moratorium in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section, may continue to impose the moratorium until such time
as comprehensive permit requirements in § 45-53-4 are amended.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002698
========